tests/morphophonology/pending/V-ә-prc_impf.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] all forms from the corpus which broke after optatives had been corrected": 
    эшлә<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : эшли
    эзлә<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : эзли
    сөйлә<v><tv><prc_impf> : сөйли
    үтә<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : үти
    билә<v><tv><pres><p3><sg>$ : били
